Utah statutes.
17C-2-503.   Additional requirements for notice of a blight hearing.

Each notice under Section 17C-2-502 for a blight hearing shall include:

(1)  a statement that:

(a)  an urban renewal project area is being proposed;

(b)  the proposed urban renewal project area may be declared to have blight;

(c)  the record owner of property within the proposed project area has the right to present evidence at the blight hearing contesting the existence of blight;

(d)  except for a hearing continued under Section 17C-2-402, the agency will notify the record property owners referred to in Subsection 17C-2-502(1)(b)(i) of each additional public hearing held by the agency concerning the urban renewal project prior to the adoption of the urban renewal project area plan; and

(e)  persons contesting the existence of blight in the proposed urban renewal project area may appear before the agency board and show cause why the proposed urban renewal project area should not be designated as an urban renewal project area; and

(2)  if the agency anticipates acquiring property in an urban renewal project area by eminent domain, a clear and plain statement that:

(a)  the project area plan may require the agency to use eminent domain; and

(b)  the proposed use of eminent domain will be discussed at the blight hearing.

